Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 2 STATE BOARD OF PAROLE
17-2-201. State board of parole - duties - definitions - repeal.

There is created the state board of parole, referred to in this part 2 as the "board", which consists of nine members. The board is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105. The members of the board are appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate, and they shall devote their full time to their duties as members of the board. The members are appointed for three-year terms; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year. A member may serve consecutive terms. The governor may remove a board member for incompetency, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, continued failure to use the risk assessment guidelines as required by section 17-22.5-404, or failure to regularly attend meetings as determined by the governor. Final conviction of a felony during the term of office of a board member automatically disqualifies the member from further service on the board. The board is composed of representatives from multidisciplinary areas of expertise. Two members must have experience in law enforcement, and one member must have experience in offender supervision, including parole, probation, or community corrections. Six members must have experience in other relevant fields. Each member of the board must have a minimum of five years of experience in a relevant field and knowledge of parole laws and guidelines, rehabilitation, correctional administration, the functioning of the criminal justice system, issues associated with victims of crime, the duties of board members, and actuarial risk assessment instruments and other offender assessment instruments used by the board and the department of corrections. A person who has been convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or who has any financial interests that conflict with the duties of a member of the board is ineligible for appointment.

Repealed.

The parole board in existence prior to July 1, 2019, is expanded to nine members on July 1, 2019. The governor shall appoint one additional member to the board for a term of two years, to expire on July 30, 2021. The governor shall appoint one additional member to the board for a term of three years, to expire on July 30, 2022. Thereafter, the governor shall appoint each such member for a term of three years.

This subsection (1)(c.2) is repealed, effective December 31, 2022.

The governor may appoint a temporary member to replace any member of the board who becomes temporarily incapacitated. Such temporary member shall not require senate confirmation unless he serves for a period longer than ninety days and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor or until the incapacitated member of the parole board is able to resume his duties. Any temporary member shall assume all the powers and duties of the incapacitated member. Any such temporary member shall have the same qualifications as a permanent member as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1). The board may not have more than two temporary members at any time.

Each board member shall complete a minimum of twenty hours of continuing education or training every year in order to maintain proficiency and to remain current on changes in parole laws and developments in the field. Each parole board member shall submit to the chairperson proof of attendance and details regarding any continuing education or training attended including the date, place, topic, the length of the training, the trainer's name, and any agency or organizational affiliation. Members may attend trainings individually or as part of a specific training offered to the parole board as a whole. The sole remedy for failure to comply with training and data collection requirements shall be removal of the board member by the governor, and the failure to comply with training and data collection requirements shall not create any right for any offender.

The governor shall appoint one of the members of the board as the chairperson of the board and shall also appoint one of the members as the vice-chairperson. Such appointments are subject to change by the governor. The chairperson shall be the administrative head of the board. The chairperson shall assure that board policy and rules and regulations are enforced. The chairperson shall also assure that proper calendars for hearings are compiled and that members are assigned to conduct such hearings. The vice-chairperson shall act in the absence of the chairperson and may fulfill such administrative duties as are delegated by the chairperson.

The chairperson, in addition to other provisions of law, has the following powers and duties:

To promulgate rules governing the granting and revocation of parole, including special needs parole pursuant to section 17-22.5-403.5, from correctional facilities where adult offenders are confined and the fixing of terms of parole and release dates. All rules governing the granting and revocation of parole promulgated by the chairperson shall be subject to the approval of a majority of the board and shall be promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

To promulgate rules for the conduct of board members, the procedures for board hearings, and procedures for the board to comply with state fiscal and procurement regulations. All administrative rules and regulations promulgated by the chairperson shall be promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

To develop and update a written operational manual for parole board members, release hearing officers, and administrative hearing officers under contract with the board by December 31, 2012. The operational manual shall include, but need not be limited to, board policies and rules, a summary of state laws governing the board, and all administrative release and revocation guidelines that the parole board is required to use. The chairperson will ensure that all new parole board members receive training and orientation on the operational manual.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, p. 833, § 3, effective May 23, 2011.)

To adopt a policy pursuant to which the board may conduct parole hearings, parole revocation hearings, and board meetings using video teleconferencing technology. At a minimum, the policy shall identify:

The agenda items, if any, that the board may not consider during video teleconferences of hearings or meetings;

The correctional facilities that the chairperson determines will be accessible via video teleconferencing for purposes of conducting hearings or meetings. In identifying such correctional facilities, the chairperson may include the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo for purposes of hearings held at the institute pursuant to subsection (10) of this section.

To ensure that parole board members, release hearing officers, and administrative hearing officers under contract with the board fulfill the annual training requirements described in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section and in section 17-2-202.5. The chairperson shall notify the governor if any board member, release hearing officer, or administrative hearing officer fails to comply with the training requirements.

To ensure that parole board members, release hearing officers, and administrative hearing officers under contract with the board are accurately collecting data and information on his or her decision-making as required by section 17-22.5-404 (6). The chairperson shall notify the governor immediately if any board member, release hearing officer, or administrative hearing officer fails to comply with data collection requirements.

To conduct an annual comprehensive review of board functions to identify workload inefficiencies and to develop strategies or recommendations to address any workload inefficiencies;

To contract with licensed attorneys to serve as administrative hearing officers to conduct parole revocation hearings pursuant to rules adopted by the parole board; or

To appoint an administrative law judge pursuant to the provisions of section 24-30-1003, C.R.S., to conduct parole revocation hearings pursuant to the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this subsection (3). Any references to the board regarding parole revocation hearings or revocation of parole shall include an administrative law judge appointed pursuant to this paragraph (h).

To contract with qualified individuals to serve as release hearing officers:

(I) To conduct parole application hearings for inmates convicted of class 4, class 5, or class 6 felonies or level 3 or level 4 drug felonies who have been assessed to be less than high risk by the Colorado risk assessment scale developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 (2)(a), or hearings pursuant to subsection (19) of this section pursuant to rules adopted by the parole board; and

(II) To set parole conditions for inmates eligible for release to mandatory parole.

(3.5) Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the chairperson shall annually make a presentation to the judiciary committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, regarding the operations of the board.

(3.7) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, an inmate is not eligible for parole if the inmate:

Has been convicted of a class 1 code of penal discipline violation within the twelve months preceding his or her next ordinarily scheduled parole hearing; or

Has, within the twelve months preceding his or her next ordinarily scheduled parole hearing, declined in writing to participate in programs that have been recommended and made available to the inmate.

An inmate who is described by subparagraph (I) or (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3.7) may be eligible for parole when the applicable condition has not been in effect for the preceding twelve months.

If two schedules with different parole application hearing dates apply to the same inmate, the board shall give effect to the schedule that includes the later parole application hearing date.

The board shall provide victim notification in accordance with section 24-4.1-302.5, C.R.S., for all parole application hearings for which the inmate is eligible for parole, as such eligibility is determined pursuant to the provisions of this section.

As used in this subsection (3.7), "eligible for parole" means an inmate is eligible to make application to the board for parole and includes an inmate's initial application as well as any subsequent application for parole review or reconsideration.

The board has the following powers and duties:

To meet as often as necessary every month to consider all applications for parole. The board may parole any person who is sentenced or committed to a correctional facility when such person has served his or her minimum sentence, less time allowed for good behavior, and there is a strong and reasonable probability that the person will not thereafter violate the law and that release of such person from institutional custody is compatible with the welfare of society. If the board refuses an application for parole, the board shall reconsider the granting of parole to such person within one year thereafter, or earlier if the board so chooses, and shall continue to reconsider the granting of parole each year thereafter until such person is granted parole or until such person is discharged pursuant to law; except that, if the person applying for parole was convicted of any class 3 sexual offense described in part 4 of article 3 of title 18, C.R.S., a habitual criminal offense as defined in section 18-1.3-801 (2.5), C.R.S., or of any offense subject to the requirements of section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S., the board need only reconsider granting parole to such person once every three years, until the board grants such person parole or until such person is discharged pursuant to law, or if the person applying for parole was convicted of a class 1 or class 2 felony that constitutes a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., the board need only reconsider granting parole to such person once every five years, until the board grants such person parole or until such person is discharged pursuant to law.

To conduct hearings on parole revocations as required by section 17-2-103. Such hearings shall be exempt from the requirements set forth in section 24-4-105, C.R.S. Judicial review of any revocation of parole shall be held pursuant to section 18-1-410 (1)(h), C.R.S.

To issue, pursuant to rules and regulations, an order of exigent circumstances to place an offender under parole supervision immediately upon release from a correctional facility when the board is prevented from complying with publication and interview requirements due to the application of time served prior to confinement in a correctional facility and the operation of good time credits;

To carry out the duties prescribed in article 11.5 of title 16, C.R.S.;

To carry out the duties prescribed in article 11.7 of title 16, C.R.S.;

To conduct an initial or subsequent parole release review in lieu of a hearing, without the presence of the inmate, if:

The application for release is for special needs parole pursuant to section 17-22.5-403.5, and victim notification is not required pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5;

A detainer from the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency has been filed with the department, the inmate meets the criteria for the presumption of parole in section 17-22.5-404.7, and victim notification is not required pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5;

The inmate has a statutory discharge date or mandatory release date within six months after his or her next ordinarily scheduled parole hearing and victim notification is not required pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5;

The inmate is assessed to be a low or very low risk on the validated risk assessment instrument developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 (2), the inmate meets readiness criteria established by the board, and victim notification is not required pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5; or

The inmate is subject to subsection (19) of this section.

The board shall notify the inmate's case manager if the board decides to conduct a parole release review without the presence of the inmate, and the case manager shall notify the inmate of the board's decision. The case manager may request that the board reconsider and conduct a hearing with the inmate present.

As to any person sentenced for conviction of a felony committed prior to July 1, 1979, or of a misdemeanor and as to any person sentenced for conviction of an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior or for which the factual basis involved an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section

16-22-102 (9)

, C.R.S., committed prior to July 1, 1996, or a class 1 felony and as to any person sentenced as a habitual criminal pursuant to section

18-1.3-801

, C.R.S., for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2003, the board has the sole power to grant or refuse to grant parole and to fix the condition thereof and has full discretion to set the duration of the term of parole granted, but in no event shall the term of parole exceed the maximum sentence imposed upon the inmate by the court or five years, whichever is less; except that the five-year limitation shall not apply to parole granted pursuant to section

17-22.5-403.7

for a class 1 felony.

Any person sentenced as a habitual criminal pursuant to section

18-1.3-801

(1.5) or (2) for an offense committed on or after July 1, 2003, shall be subject to the mandatory parole set forth in section

18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V)

(A),

18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V)

(A.1), or

18-1.3-401.5

for the class or level of felony of which the person is convicted.

As to any person sentenced as a habitual criminal pursuant to section

18-1.3-801

(1) or (2.5), C.R.S., for an offense committed on or after July 1, 2003, upon completion of forty calendar years of incarceration in the department of corrections, the parole board may schedule a hearing to determine whether the inmate may be released on parole. If the inmate is released on parole, the life sentence shall continue and shall not be deemed to be discharged until such time as the parole board may discharge the offender. The offender shall serve at least five years on parole prior to discharge. If the parole board revokes the parole, the offender shall be returned to the department of corrections to serve the remainder of the life sentence. The parole board need only reconsider granting parole to such inmate once every three years.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a.7) of this subsection (5), as to any person sentenced for conviction of an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior or for which the factual basis involved an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section

16-22-102 (9)

, C.R.S., committed on or after July 1, 1996, but prior to July 1, 2002, the board has the sole power to grant or refuse to grant parole and to fix the condition thereof and has full discretion to set the duration of the term of parole granted, but in no event shall the term of parole exceed the maximum sentence imposed upon the inmate by the court.

As to any person who is sentenced for conviction of an offense committed on or after July 1, 2002, involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), or for conviction of an offense committed on or after July 1, 2002, the underlying factual basis of which involved unlawful sexual behavior, and who is not subject to the provisions of part 10 of article 1.3 of title 18, such person shall be subject to the mandatory period of parole set forth in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V)(A) or 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V)(A.1).

As to any person sentenced for conviction of a sex offense pursuant to the provisions of part 10 of article 1.3 of title 18, C.R.S., committed on or after November 1, 1998, the board shall grant parole or refuse to grant parole, fix the conditions thereof, and set the duration of the term of parole granted pursuant to the provisions of part 10 of article 1.3 of title 18, C.R.S.

Conditions imposed for parole may include, but are not limited to, requiring that the offender pay reasonable costs of supervision of parole or placing the offender on home detention as defined in section

18-1.3-106

(1.1), C.R.S.

As a condition of parole, the board shall order that the offender make restitution to the victim or victims of his or her conduct if such restitution has been ordered by the court pursuant to article 18.5 of title 16. The order must require the offender to make restitution within the period of time that the offender is on parole as specified by the board. In the event that the defendant does not make full restitution by the date specified by the board, the restitution may be collected as provided for in article 18.5 of title 16.

Except if the offender is subject to subsection (19) of this section, if the offender fails to pay the restitution, he or she may be returned to the board and, upon proof of failure to pay, the board shall:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1779, § 5, effective June 3, 1996.)

Order that the offender continue on parole or extend the period of parole, either subject to the same condition or modified conditions of parole; or

Revoke the parole and request the sheriff of the county in which the hearing is held to transport the parolee to a place of confinement designated by the executive director; or

Revoke parole for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty days and request the sheriff of the county in which the hearing is held to transport the parolee to a community corrections program pursuant to section

18-1.3-301 (3)

, C.R.S., a place of confinement within the department of corrections, or any private facility that is under contract with the department of corrections; or

Revoke parole for a period not to exceed ninety days and request the sheriff of the county in which the hearing is held to transport the parolee to the county jail of such county or to any private facility that is under contract with the department of corrections.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1043, § 4, effective September 1, 2000.)

If, as a condition of parole pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), a parolee will be required to attend a postsecondary educational institution as a part of his parole plan, the board, before granting parole, shall first notify the postsecondary educational institution and the prosecuting attorney of the parolee's plan and request their comments thereon. The notice shall include all relevant information pertaining to the person and the crime for which he was convicted. The postsecondary educational institution and the prosecuting attorney shall reply to the board in writing within ten days of receipt of the notification or within such other reasonable time in excess of ten days as specified by the board. The postsecondary educational institution's reply shall include a statement of whether or not it will accept the parolee as a student. Acceptance by a state postsecondary educational institution shall be pursuant to section

23-5-106

, C.R.S.

As a condition of parole of every person convicted of the class 2 felony of sexual assault in the first degree under section

18-3-402 (3)

, C.R.S., for an offense committed prior to November 1, 1998, the board shall require that the parolee participate in a program of mental health counseling or receive appropriate treatment to the extent that the board deems appropriate to effectuate the successful reintegration of the parolee into the community.

As a condition of every parole, the parolee shall sign a written agreement that contains such parole conditions as deemed appropriate by the board, which conditions shall include but need not be limited to the following:

That the parolee shall go directly to a place designated by the board upon his release from the institution to which he has been confined;

That the parolee shall establish a residence of record and shall not change it without giving prior notification to his or her community parole officer and that the parolee shall not leave the state without the permission of his or her community parole officer;

That the parolee shall obey all state and federal laws and municipal ordinances, conduct himself or herself as a law-abiding citizen, and obey and cooperate with his or her community parole officer;

That the parolee shall make reports as directed by his or her community parole officer, permit residential visits by the community parole officer, and allow the community parole officer to make searches of his or her person, residence, or vehicle;

That the parolee shall not own, possess, or have under his control or in his custody any firearm or other deadly weapon;

Repealed.

That the parolee shall seek and obtain employment or shall participate in a full-time educational or vocational program while on parole, unless such requirement is waived by his or her community parole officer;

That the parolee shall not abuse alcoholic beverages or use illegal drugs while on parole;

That the parolee shall abide by any other condition the board may determine to be necessary;

That the parolee shall contact any delegate child support enforcement unit with whom the parolee may have a child support case to arrange and fulfill a payment plan to pay current child support, child support arrearages, or child support debt due under a court or administrative order.

The parole agreement shall also contain a notification to the parolee that, should he violate any of the said conditions or should his behavior while on parole indicate the potentiality for criminality or violence, his parole may be subject to revocation.

The provisions of this paragraph (f) shall apply to any person paroled on or after July 1, 1987, and to any person whose parole conditions are modified by the board on or after said date.

As a condition of parole, the board shall require any offender convicted of or who pled guilty or nolo contendere to an offense for which the factual basis involved a sexual offense as described in part 4 of article 3 of title 18, C.R.S., to submit to chemical testing of a biological substance sample from the offender to determine the genetic markers thereof and to chemical testing of his or her saliva to determine the secretor status thereof. Such testing shall occur prior to the offender's release from incarceration, and the results thereof shall be filed with and maintained by the Colorado bureau of investigation. The results of such tests shall be furnished to any law enforcement agency upon request.

The provisions of this paragraph (g) shall apply to any person who is paroled on or after May 29, 1988, and to any person whose parole conditions are modified by the board on or after said date.

Any costs of implementing this paragraph (g) shall be derived solely from appropriations made from moneys in the victims assistance and law enforcement fund created pursuant to section

24-33.5-506

, C.R.S.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2001, p. 955, § 3, effective July 1, 2001.)

As a condition of parole, the board may order any person who is not otherwise subject to the provisions of article 22 of title 16, C.R.S., and is convicted of an offense, the underlying factual basis of which is determined by the department of corrections to involve unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), C.R.S., to register as a sex offender for the period of the person's parole. Such registration shall be completed as provided in article 22 of title 16, C.R.S. Within five business days after completion of the period of parole and final discharge from the legal custody of the department of corrections, the department of corrections shall notify the Colorado bureau of investigation to remove the person's name from the Colorado sex offender registry.

As a condition of every grant of parole, the board shall require the offender to execute a written prior waiver of extradition stating that the offender consents to extradition to this state and waives all formal procedures incidental to extradition proceedings in the event that the offender is arrested in another state upon an allegation that the defendant has violated the terms of his or her parole, and acknowledging that the offender shall not be admitted to bail in any other state pending extradition to this state.

(5.5) (a) As a condition of parole, the board may require every parolee at the parolee's own expense to submit to random chemical testing of a biological substance sample from the parolee to determine the presence of drugs or alcohol.

For purposes of this subsection (5.5), "drug" means:

Any "controlled substance" as defined in section

18-18-102 (5)

, C.R.S.; and

Any "drug" as defined in section

27-80-203

(13), C.R.S., if chemical testing conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5.5) reveals such drug is present at such a level as to be considered abusive pursuant to regulations established by the board in consultation with the department of human services.

If chemical testing is required as a condition of parole, the community parole officer is responsible for acquiring at random a biological substance sample from a parolee.

At the time the community parole officer acquires a biological substance sample pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), the community parole officer shall direct the parolee to pay the necessary fee for the testing of his or her biological substance sample directly to the private laboratory under contract with the department, the department of public safety, or a local governmental agency pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c).

The community parole officer shall submit the biological substance sample to a private laboratory under contract with the department, the department of public safety, or a local governmental agency pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c) for testing. The contracting laboratory shall return the results of the tests to the community parole officer within five working days after receipt of the sample. The results of the test shall be made available by the community parole officer to the parolee or the parolee's attorney on request.

The department and the department of public safety and local governmental agencies for inmates paroled to community corrections facilities shall enter into one or more contracts with private laboratories for chemical testing under this subsection (5.5). Any private laboratory that contracts with the department, the department of public safety, or a local governmental agency shall use appropriate methods to ensure compliance with evidentiary rules and requirements. Any contract entered into pursuant to this subparagraph (IV) shall specify the fee to be charged the parolee for chemical biological substance sample testing.

If a chemical test administered pursuant to the requirements of this subsection (5.5) reflects the presence of drugs or alcohol, the parolee may be required to participate at his own expense in an appropriate drug or alcohol program, community correctional nonresidential program, mental health program, or other fee-based or non-fee-based treatment program approved by the parole board.

Any subsequent chemical testing reflecting the presence of alcohol may be grounds for arrest of the parolee and the initiation of revocation proceedings at the discretion of the community parole officer pursuant to section

17-2-103

.

A parolee may be arrested and a proceeding for revocation may be initiated pursuant to the provisions of section

17-2-103

if any subsequent chemical test reflects the presence of drugs pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (5.5).

A parolee may be arrested and proceedings for revocation may be initiated pursuant to section

17-2-103

if any subsequent chemical test reveals the presence of drugs as defined in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (5.5) at a level considered to be abusive as established by the board pursuant to said section.

Repealed.

Section

16-3-309

, C.R.S., pertaining to the admissibility of laboratory tests shall apply to the admissibility of chemical tests required by this subsection (5.5) in parole revocation hearings conducted pursuant to section 17-2-103.

This subsection (5.5) shall not apply to any parolee to whom article 11.5 of title 16, C.R.S., applies.

(5.7) If, as a condition of parole, an offender is required to undergo counseling or treatment, unless the parole board determines that treatment at another facility or with another person is warranted, the treatment or counseling must be at a facility or with a person:

Approved by the behavioral health administration in the department of human services if the treatment is for alcohol or drug abuse;

Certified or approved by the sex offender management board, established in section

16-11.7-103

, C.R.S., if the offender is a sex offender;

Certified or approved by a domestic violence treatment board, established pursuant to part 8 of article 6 of title 18, C.R.S., if the offender was convicted of or the underlying factual basis of the offense included an act of domestic violence as defined in section

18-6-800.3

, C.R.S.; or

Licensed or certified by the division of adult parole in the department of corrections, the department of regulatory agencies, the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, the state board of nursing, or the Colorado medical board, whichever is appropriate for the required treatment or counseling.

(5.8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (5.7) of this section, if, as a condition of parole, an offender who was convicted of or pled guilty to an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), C.R.S., is required to undergo counseling or treatment, such treatment or counseling shall be at a facility or with a person listed in subsection (5.7) of this section and the parole board may not determine treatment at another facility or with another person is warranted.

(5.9) As a condition of parole of each person convicted of a felony DUI offense described in section

42-4-1301 (1)(a)

, (1)(b), or (2)(a), C.R.S., the board shall require the parolee to use an approved ignition interlock device for the entire period of the person's parole.

The board has the authority at any time after the period of any parole is fixed to shorten the period thereof or to lengthen said period within the limits specified in subsection (5) of this section; except that the provisions of this subsection (6) shall not apply to any person sentenced as a sex offender pursuant to part 10 of article 1.3 of title 18, C.R.S.

The board has exclusive power to conduct all proceedings involving an application for revocation of parole.

The board has the power, in the performance of official duties, to issue warrants and subpoenas, to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and other documents pertinent to the subject of its inquiry, and to administer oaths and take the testimony of persons under oath. The issuance of a warrant tolls the expiration of a parolee's parole.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (f) of subsection (4) of this section, whenever an inmate initially applies for parole, the board shall conduct an interview with the inmate. At such interview at least one member of the board shall be present. Any final action on an application shall not be required to be made in the presence of the inmate or parolee, and any such action shall require the concurrence of at least two members of the board. When the two members do not concur, a third member shall review the record and, if deemed necessary, interview the applicant and cast the deciding vote. Any subsequent application for parole shall be considered by the board in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section.
(9) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (f) of subsection (4) of this section, whenever an inmate initially applies for parole, the board shall conduct an interview with the inmate. At such interview at least one member of the board shall be present. Any final action on an application shall not be required to be made in the presence of the inmate or parolee, and any such action shall require the concurrence of at least two members of the board. When the two members do not concur, a third member shall review the record and, if deemed necessary, interview the applicant and cast the deciding vote. Any subsequent application for parole shall be considered by the board in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section.

The provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) shall also apply to all interviews of inmates who apply for parole pursuant to section 17-22.5-303, who were sentenced for an offense committed on or after July 1, 1979.

When a recommendation has been made before the board for revocation or modification of a parole, the final disposition of such application shall be reduced to writing. The parolee shall be advised by the board of the final decision at the conclusion of the hearing or within a period not to exceed five working days following said hearing; however, a parolee may waive the five-day notice requirement. A copy of the final order of the board shall be delivered to the parolee within ten working days after the completion of the hearing.

If the parolee decides to appeal the decision to revoke his parole, such appeal shall be filed within thirty days of such decision. The parolee shall remain in custody pending the appeal. Two members of the board, excluding the one who conducted the revocation proceeding, shall review the record within fifteen working days after the filing of the appeal. They shall notify the parolee of their decision in writing within ten working days after such decision has been made.

The district attorney or the attorney general may appeal the decision of a member of the board to two members of the board, excluding the member who conducted the parole revocation proceeding.

The board shall interview all parole applicants at the institution or in the community in which the inmate is physically held or through teleconferencing as provided in subsection (3)(d)(II) of this section. The site location of an interview must not be changed within the thirty days preceding the interview date without the approval of the board. Any inmate of an adult correctional institution who has been transferred by executive order or by civil certification or ordered by a court of law to the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo may be heard at the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo upon an application for parole.

Repealed.

All votes of the board at any hearing or appeal held pursuant to this section shall be recorded by member and shall be a public record open to inspection and shall be subject to the provisions of part 3 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

The board may appoint or contract with an attorney to represent a parolee at a parole revocation hearing only if:

The parolee denies that he violated the condition or conditions of his parole, as set forth in the complaint;

The parolee is incapable of speaking effectively for himself;

The parolee establishes to the satisfaction of the board that he is indigent; and

The board, after reviewing the complaint, makes specific findings in writing that the issues to be resolved are complex and that the parolee requires the assistance of counsel.

Repealed.

The board shall consider the parole of a person whose parole is revoked either for a technical violation or based on a self-revocation at least once within one hundred eighty days after the revocation if the person's release date is more than nine months from the date of the person's revocation; except that a person whose parole is revoked based on a technical violation that involved the use of a weapon shall not be considered for parole for one year.

Each correctional facility and private contract prison shall make available to the board hearing room space and video teleconferencing technology that are acceptable to the board for the purpose of conducting parole hearings within the administrative area of or another location within the facility acceptable to the board.

The board shall submit to the department of corrections staff involved with making community corrections transition placement referrals the name and register number of each inmate the board is recommending for community corrections transition placement. The department of corrections staff involved with making community corrections transition placement referrals shall inform the board when the referral has been made or the reason why it was not submitted.

If an offender completes a community corrections program, the board shall schedule a parole release hearing within sixty days after the offender's completion of the program. If the decision is to deny parole, a majority of the full board is required to deny parole pursuant to this subsection (17).

The parole board shall conduct a file review for each inmate who is listed on the notifications provided to the board pursuant to section 17-1-119.7 (2)(a)(II) or (2)(a)(III) within ten days after receiving the notification. The parole board must evaluate the inmate's institutional behavior, program progress, and appropriateness for release.
